Maine, session 132, LD436.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §1067 is enacted to read:
§1067. Prohibition on promoting COVID-19 vaccination to children
The department or any other state agency, through any program, including the
MaineCare program, may not promote the COVID-19 vaccination through any means,
including publicly accessible websites or the distribution of promotional or educational
materials, to any individual who has not attained 18 years of age. For purposes of this
section, COVID-19 has the same meaning as in Title 24-A, section 4320-P, subsection 1,
paragraph A.